Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.38
Used motor vehicle, defined.

Used motor vehicle
means every motor vehicle which has been sold, bargained, exchanged, or given
away or for which title has been transferred from the person who first acquired
it from the manufacturer, importer, dealer, or agent of the manufacturer or
importer.

A new motor vehicle
is not considered a used motor vehicle until it has been placed in use by
a bona fide consumer, notwithstanding the number of transfers of the motor
vehicle.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 50.